Utah statutes.
72-3-110.   Proposal to bypass or provide alternate route through city or
town -- Notice and hearing required.
(1)  Whenever the department proposes to construct a highway bypassing any
city or town, or to provide an alternate route through or outside any city or
town, the commission shall notify the governing officials of the city or town
and hold a public hearing, on a date set, for the purpose of advising the
citizens of the city or town of the reason or reasons for the highway proposed
to be constructed.
(2)  The hearing shall be held within the city or town to be bypassed, except
that if the highway proposed will bypass or provide an alternate route through
or outside of several cities or towns located within close proximity to each
other, the commission may combine the hearings and hold them in one city or
town centrally and conveniently located to the others at which time each city
and town shall be given ample opportunity to be heard.
(3)  Subsequent to the hearing, the commission shall notify in writing the
officials of the city or town, or of each of the cities or towns if the
hearings are combined, of the decision reached as a result of the hearing
within ten days from the time the decision is reached.
